California, session 20252026, AB1512.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 1004 of the Education Code is amended to read:1004. The resolution of the county committee approving a reduction or increase in the number of members of the county board of education shall constitute an order of election, and the proposal shall be presented to the electors of the county not later than the next succeeding election for members of the county board of education. The ballot shall contain the following words, as appropriate: “Shall the number of members of the county board of education be decreased (increased) from seven (five) to five (seven)?” To the right of or below those words, the words “Yes” and “No” shall be printed on separate lines, with voting targets. If a voter marks the voting target next to the printed word “Yes,” the voter’s vote shall be counted in favor of the adoption of the measure. If the voter marks the voting target next to the printed word “No,” the voter’s vote shall be counted against its adoption.SEC. 2. Section 5020 of the Education Code is amended to read:5020. (a) (1) The resolution of the county committee approving a proposal to establish or abolish trustee areas, to adopt one of the alternative methods of electing governing board members specified in Section 5030, or to increase or decrease the number of members of the governing board shall constitute an order of election, and the proposal shall be presented to the electors of the district not later than the next succeeding election for members of the governing board.(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), a county committee may, by resolution, approve a proposal to establish trustee areas and to elect governing board members using district-based elections, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 14026 of the Elections Code, without being required to submit the resolution to the electors of the district for approval. A resolution adopted pursuant to this paragraph shall include a declaration that the change in the method of electing members of the governing body is being made in furtherance of the purposes of the California Voting Rights Act of 2001 (Chapter 1.5 (commencing with Section 14025) of Division 14 of the Elections Code). The resolution shall take effect upon adoption and shall govern all elections for governing board members occurring at least 125 days after the adoption of the resolution.(b) If a petition requesting an election on a proposal to rearrange trustee area boundaries is filed, containing at least 5 percent of the signatures of the district’s registered voters as determined by the elections official, the proposal shall be presented to the electors of the district, at the next succeeding election for the members of the governing board, at the next succeeding statewide primary or general election, or at the next succeeding regularly scheduled election at which the electors of the district are otherwise entitled to vote if there is sufficient time to place the issue on the ballot. The rearranged trustee areas shall comply with the criteria and requirements in Section 21130 of the Elections Code.(c) If a petition requesting an election on a proposal to establish or abolish trustee areas, to increase or decrease the number of members of the board, or to adopt one of the alternative methods of electing governing board members specified in Section 5030 is filed, containing at least 10 percent of the signatures of the district’s registered voters as determined by the elections official, the proposal shall be presented to the electors of the district, at the next succeeding election for the members of the governing board, at the next succeeding statewide primary or general election, or at the next succeeding regularly scheduled election at which the electors of the district are otherwise entitled to vote if there is sufficient time to place the issue on the ballot. Before the proposal is presented to the electors, the county committee on school district organization may call and conduct one or more public hearings on the proposal.(d) The resolution of the county committee approving a proposal to establish or abolish a common governing board for a high school and an elementary school district within the boundaries of the high school district shall constitute an order of election. The proposal shall be presented to the electors of the district at the next succeeding statewide primary or general election, or at the next succeeding regularly scheduled election at which the electors of the district are otherwise entitled to vote if there is sufficient time to place the issue on the ballot.(e) (1) For each proposal there shall be a separate proposition on the ballot. The ballot shall contain the following words:“Shall trustee areas be established (or abolished or rearranged) in ____ (insert name) School District?”“Shall the number of members of the governing board of ____ (insert name) School District be increased from five to seven?”“Shall the number of members of the governing board of ____ (insert name) School District be decreased from seven to five?”“Shall each member of the governing board of the ____ (insert name) School District be elected by the registered voters of the entire _____ (insert name) School District?”“Shall one member of the governing board of the ____ (insert name) School District residing in each trustee area be elected by the registered voters in that trustee area?”“Shall one member, or more than one member for one or more trustee areas, of the governing board of the ____ (insert name) School District residing in each trustee area be elected by the registered voters of the entire ____ (insert name) School District?”“Shall a common governing board in the ____ (insert name) School District and the ____ (insert name) School District be established (or abolished)?”(2) To the right of or below the words describing each proposal to be voted on, the words “Yes” and “No” shall be printed on separate lines, with voting targets. If a voter marks the voting target next to the printed word “Yes,” the voter’s vote shall be counted in favor of the adoption of the proposal. If the voter marks the voting target next to the printed word “No,” the voter’s vote shall be counted against its adoption.(f) If more than one proposal appears on the ballot, all must carry in order for any to become effective, except as follows:(1) A proposal to adopt one of the methods of election of board members specified in Section 5030 that is approved by the voters shall become effective unless a proposal that is inconsistent with that proposal has been approved by a greater number of voters.(2) An inconsistent proposal approved by a lesser number of voters than the number which have approved a proposal to adopt one of the methods of election of board members specified in Section 5030 shall not be effective.SEC. 3. Section 15122 of the Education Code is amended to read:15122. (a) A brief statement of the proposition, setting forth the amount of the bonds to be voted upon, the maximum rate of interest, and the purposes for which the proceeds of the sale of the bonds are to be used, shall be printed upon the ballot. To the right of or below the statement of the proposition to be voted on, the words “Yes” and “No” shall be printed on separate lines, with voting targets. If a voter marks the voting target next to the printed word “Yes,” the voter’s vote shall be counted in favor of the adoption of the proposition. If the voter marks the voting target next to the printed word “No,” the voter’s vote shall be counted against its adoption.(b) A defect in the statement, other than in the statement of the amount of the bonds to be authorized, shall not invalidate the bonds election.SEC. 4. Section 18333 of the Education Code is amended to read:18333. The election shall be conducted in accordance with the general election laws of this state, where applicable, without reference to form of ballot or manner of voting. The ballot shall contain the words “Shall the Union High School Library District be established?” To the right of or below those words, the words “Yes” and “No” shall be printed on separate lines, with voting targets. If a voter marks the voting target next to the printed word “Yes,” the voter’s vote shall be counted in favor of the adoption of the proposal. If the voter marks the voting target next to the printed word “No,” the voter’s vote shall be counted against its adoption.SEC. 5. Section 18513 of the Education Code is amended to read:18513. Voting shall be by ballot, without reference to the general election law in regard to form of ballot or manner of voting. The ballots shall have printed on them the words “Shall the measure (stating the nature thereof) be adopted?” To the right or below the statement of the measure to be voted on, the words “Yes” and “No” shall be printed on separate lines, with voting targets. If a voter marks the voting target next to the printed word “Yes,” the voter’s vote shall be counted in favor of the adoption of the measure. If the voter marks the voting target next to the printed word “No,” the voter’s vote shall be counted against its adoption.SEC. 6. Section 19608 of the Education Code is amended to read:19608. The election shall be conducted in accordance with the general election laws of this state, where applicable, without reference to form of ballot or manner of voting. The ballot shall contain the words “Shall the library district be established?” To the right of or below those words, the words “Yes” and “No” shall be printed on separate lines, with voting targets. If a voter marks the voting target next to the printed word “Yes,” the voter’s vote shall be counted in favor of the adoption of the proposal. If the voter marks the voting target next to the printed word “No,” the voter’s vote shall be counted against its adoption.SEC. 7. Section 19724 of the Education Code is amended to read:19724. Voting shall be by ballot, without reference to the general election law in regard to form of ballot, or manner of voting. The ballots shall have printed on them the words “Shall the measure (stating the nature thereof) be adopted?” To the right or below the statement of the measure to be voted on, the words “Yes” and “No” shall be printed on separate lines, with voting targets. If a voter marks the voting target next to the printed word “Yes,” the voter’s vote shall be counted in favor of the adoption of the measure. If the voter marks the voting target next to the printed word “No,” the voter’s vote shall be counted against its adoption.SEC. 8. Section 24906 of the Education Code is amended to read:24906. There shall be printed on the ballots to be used at the election the proposition: “Shall the governing boards of (here insert the names of the districts under the control of the boards submitting the proposition) school districts be authorized to establish a plan for a joint district retirement salary for the teachers and such other employees of the districts as the governing boards or the petition determines.” To the right of or below the proposition to be voted on, the words “Yes” and “No” shall be printed on separate lines, with voting targets.SEC. 9. Section 35762 of the Education Code is amended to read:35762. (a) The words to appear upon the ballots used for voting upon the adoption or rejection of the proposals for the reorganization of school districts shall be “Shall the school districts be reorganized as proposed?”, or words of similar import. To the right of or below those words, the words “Yes” and “No” shall be printed on separate lines, with voting targets. If a voter marks the voting target next to the printed word “Yes,” the voter’s vote shall be counted in favor of the adoption of the proposal. If the voter marks the voting target next to the printed word “No,” the voter’s vote shall be counted against its adoption.(b) If the plans and recommendations include a proposal for trustee areas in accordance with Section 35734, such proposal shall be considered a part of the reorganization proposition to be voted upon, and the ballot shall include wording to that effect.SEC. 10. Section 72026 of the Education Code is amended to read:72026. (a) Notwithstanding any other law, if the governing board of a community college district finds that the boundaries of trustee areas do not conform to the district’s geography or population distribution due to annexation of territory to the district after the trustee boundaries were formed, the board may, in its discretion, order a special election seeking voter approval for rearrangement of such areas in the manner provided in this section.(b) (1) Upon adoption of a resolution by a majority of the members, the board shall call and conduct at least one public hearing on the proposed rearrangement of trustee area boundaries by publishing notice of the proposed rearrangement in accordance with Section 6061 of the Government Code. The notice shall be published at least 10 days prior to each hearing to be held and shall state the time and place of the hearing and the general nature of the proposed boundary rearrangement.(2) At the conclusion of the public hearing or hearings, the board may adopt a resolution by majority vote of its members ordering a special election on the proposed rearrangement of trustee areas within the district. The election shall be consolidated with the next scheduled primary or general statewide election and shall be called and conducted by the county superintendent of schools having jurisdiction in the manner otherwise prescribed for elections in Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 5300) of Part 4 of Division 1 of Title 1.(c) The ballot shall contain the following words properly located on the ballot: “Shall the trustee areas in _____ (insert name) Community College District be rearranged?” To the right of or below those words, the words “Yes” and “No” shall be printed on separate lines, with voting targets. If a voter marks the voting target next to the printed word “Yes,” the voter’s vote shall be counted in favor of the adoption of the rearrangement. If the voter marks the voting target next to the printed word “No,” the voter’s vote shall be counted against its adoption. (d) If the proposal for the rearrangement of trustee areas within the district pursuant to this section is approved by a majority of the electors voting at the election and it appears that one or more trustee areas in the district will not be represented in the membership of the governing board or that one or more trustee areas will have more than its allotted number of representatives in the membership of the governing board, the county superintendent of schools having jurisdiction shall call and conduct an election to determine who shall represent such trustee area or areas at the next regular election for community college trustees as otherwise provided by law. The term of office of a newly elected and qualified member shall expire on the date the term of the former member would have expired if the former member had remained in office. If the offices of two or more members become vacant due to the operation of this subdivision, the county superintendent of schools shall determine by lot which term of office of former members shall be assumed by which of the newly elected and qualified members.SEC. 11. Section 23271 of the Government Code is amended to read:23271. Ballots at the election shall contain the words “Shall (description of territory) be transferred to (name of county accepting transferred territory)?” To the right of or below those words, the words “Yes” and “No” shall be printed on separate lines, with voting targets. If a voter marks the voting target next to the printed word “Yes,” the voter’s vote shall be counted in favor of the adoption of the transfer of territory. If the voter marks the voting target next to the printed word “No,” the voter’s vote shall be counted against its adoption.SEC. 12. Section 23355 of the Government Code is amended to read:23355. Ballots at the election shall contain the question:“Shall the new County of (insert the name of the proposed county) be formed?”To the right of or below the question, the words “Yes” and “No” shall be printed on separate lines, with voting targets. If a voter marks the voting target next to the printed word “Yes,” the voter’s vote shall be counted in favor of the adoption of the formation of the new county. If the voter marks the voting target next to the printed word “No,” the voter’s vote shall be counted against its adoption.SEC. 13. Section 23374.5 of the Government Code is amended to read:23374.5. Ballots at the election provided for in this article shall contain the question:“Shall (insert the name of the county seat as determined by commission) be the county seat of the County of (insert the name of the county)?”To the right of or below the question, the words “Yes” and “No” shall be printed on separate lines, with voting targets. If a voter marks the voting target next to the printed word “Yes,” the voter’s vote shall be counted in favor of the adoption of the county seat. If the voter marks the voting target next to the printed word “No,” the voter’s vote shall be counted against its adoption.SEC. 14. Section 29903 of the Government Code is repealed.SEC. 15. Section 29903 is added to the Government Code, to read:29903. To the right of or below each bond proposition on the ballot, the words “Yes” and “No” shall be printed on separate lines, with voting targets.SEC. 16. Section 34876.5 of the Government Code is amended to read:34876.5. (a) (1) If an ordinance is submitted to the voters pursuant to Section 34871, there shall be printed on the ballots substantially as follows:“Shall members of the legislative body of the City of ____ be elected by (or from) districts?”or, if applicable:“Shall members of the legislative body of the City of ____ be elected by (or from) districts, and the Mayor of the City of ____ be elected on a citywide basis by the voters of the entire city?”(2) To the right of or below the words describing the proposal pursuant to paragraph (1), the words “Yes” and “No” shall be printed on separate lines, with voting targets. If a voter marks the voting target next to the printed word “Yes,” the voter’s vote shall be counted in favor of the adoption of the proposal. If the voter marks the voting target next to the printed word “No,” the voter’s vote shall be counted against its adoption.(b) If a majority of the voters voting on the proposed ordinance vote in its favor, members of the legislative body shall be elected in the manner approved by the voters beginning at the first election following approval of the district boundaries pursuant to Section 34877.5, and for which the election consolidation deadlines established in the Elections Code have not passed.SEC. 17. Section 51929 of the Government Code is amended to read:51929. Upon the ballots used at the election shall be printed the words: “Shall the city (or cities) of (naming them) and the County of Sacramento be reorganized and consolidated and shall the proposed Charter of the City-County of Sacramento be adopted as the governing law of the City-County of Sacramento?”To the right of or below these words, the words “Yes” and “No” shall be printed on separate lines, with voting targets. Each proposition separately submitted shall also be similarly presented to the electors.SEC. 18. Section 51930 of the Government Code is amended to read:51930. If, voting on a proposition presented pursuant to Section 51929, an elector marks the voting target next to the word “Yes,” the elector’s vote shall be counted for reorganization and charter adoption, and if the elector marks the voting target next to the word “No,” the elector’s vote shall be counted against reorganization and charter adoption.SEC. 19. Section 51931 of the Government Code is amended to read:51931. On each proposition separately submitted, including the proposition presented pursuant to Section 51929.5, if an elector marks the voting target next to the word “Yes,” the elector’s vote shall be counted for the adoption of the proposition, and if the elector marks the voting target next to the word “No,” the elector’s vote shall be counted against the adoption of the proposition.SEC. 20. Section 57137 of the Government Code is amended to read:57137. On the ballot to the right of or below each question, the words “Yes” and “No” shall be printed on separate lines with voting targets.SEC. 21. Section 6463 of the Health and Safety Code is amended to read:6463. The ballots shall contain the words, “Shall the sanitary district be formed?” To the right of or below these words, the words “Yes” and “No” shall be printed on separate lines, with voting targets. The ballot shall also contain the names of the persons to be voted for at the election.SEC. 22. Section 6612 of the Health and Safety Code is amended to read:6612. The vote shall be by ballot, without reference to the general law in regard to form of ballot.The ballots shall have printed on them the words “Shall the measure (stating the nature thereof) be adopted?” To the right or below the statement of the measure to be voted on, the words “Yes” and “No” shall be printed on separate lines, with voting targets.SEC. 23. Section 20104 of the Health and Safety Code is repealed.SEC. 24. Section 20104 is added to the Health and Safety Code, to read:20104. To the right of or below the question on the ballot, the words “Yes” and “No” shall be printed on separate lines, with voting targets.SEC. 25. Section 5105 of the Public Resources Code is repealed.SEC. 26. Section 5105 is added to the Public Resources Code, to read:5105. The ballots shall have printed on them the words “Shall the measure (stating the nature thereof) be adopted?” To the right or below the statement of the measure to be voted on, the words “Yes” and “No” shall be printed on separate lines, with voting targets.SEC. 27. Section 2965 of the Public Utilities Code is amended to read:2965. The ballots to be used at any general municipal election or at any special election, at which is submitted the question whether a municipal corporation shall retain its powers of control respecting public utilities shall have printed thereon, in addition to the other matters required by law, those of the following propositions as are specified in the ordinance of intention or the petition:“Proposition No. 1.Shall ______ (name of municipal corporation) retain its powers of control over railroad corporations?”“Proposition No. 2.Shall ______ (name of municipal corporation) retain its powers of control over street railroad corporations?”“Proposition No. 3.Shall ______ (name of municipal corporation) retain its powers of control over common carriers other than railroad and street railroad corporations?”“Proposition No. 4.Shall ______ (name of municipal corporation) retain its powers of control over gas corporations?”“Proposition No. 5.Shall ______ (name of municipal corporation) retain its powers of control over electrical corporations?”“Proposition No. 6.Shall ______ (name of municipal corporation) retain its powers of control over telephone corporations?”“Proposition No. 7.Shall ______ (name of municipal corporation) retain its powers of control over telegraph corporations?”“Proposition No. 8.Shall ______ (name of municipal corporation) retain its powers of control over water corporations?”“Proposition No. 9.Shall ______ (name of municipal corporation) retain its powers of control over wharfingers?”“Proposition No. 10.Shall ______ (name of municipal corporation) retain its powers of control over warehousemen?”To the right of or below each proposition to be voted upon, the words “Yes” and “No” shall be printed on separate lines, with voting targets. If a voter marks the voting target next to the printed word “Yes,” the voter’s vote shall be counted in favor of the retention of the powers of control of the municipal corporation. If the voter marks the voting target next to the printed word “No,” the voter’s vote shall be counted against the retention of those powers.SEC. 28. Section 2973 of the Public Utilities Code is amended to read:2973. The ballots to be used at the election shall have printed thereon, in addition to the other matters required by law, separate propositions as to each class of public utilities as to which the municipal corporation may retain its powers of control and as to which it is desired to vote. As to each of such classes of public utilities, and in addition to the other matters required by law to be printed thereon, a proposition shall be printed on the ballot to be used at the election in substantially the following form: “Shall ______ (name of municipal corporation) surrender its powers of control over ______ (here insert class of public utility) to the Public Utilities Commission?” To the right of or below each proposition to be voted upon, the words “Yes” and “No” shall be printed on separate lines, with voting targets. If a voter marks the voting target next to the printed word “Yes,” the voter’s vote shall be counted in favor of surrendering of the powers of control of the municipal corporation. If the voter marks the voting target next to the printed word “No,” the voter’s vote shall be counted against the surrendering of those powers.SEC. 29. Section 22740 of the Public Utilities Code is amended to read:22740. The ballot shall contain the following:(a) “Official ballot provided by the board of directors of the ‛____ airport district’ to be used in the bond election of said district in the county of ____, State of California, on the ____ day of ____ 20__.”(b) Other matters required by law.(c) To the right of or below the bond proposition on the ballot, the words “Yes” and “No” on separate lines, with voting targets.SEC. 30. Section 22743 of the Public Utilities Code is amended to read:22743. Each voter shall completely select the voting target next to either “Yes” or “No” respectively, to indicate whether the voter has voted for or against the issuance of the bonds.SEC. 31. Section 1176 of the Streets and Highways Code is amended to read:1176. For the purposes of this election, the board shall establish, by order, one or more precincts and appoint three judges for each precinct to conduct the election. The election shall be conducted as nearly as practicable in conformity with the general election laws, but no particular form of ballot need be used. To the right of or below the question on the ballot, the words “Yes” and “No” shall be printed on separate lines, with voting targets. An informality in conducting the election shall not invalidate the election if it was otherwise fairly conducted.SEC. 32. Section 1182 of the Streets and Highways Code is amended to read:1182. The election shall be conducted as nearly as practicable in accordance with the general election laws, but no particular form of ballot need be used. An informality in conducting the election shall not invalidate the election if it was otherwise fairly conducted. To the right of or below each bond proposition on the ballot, the words “Yes” and “No” shall be printed on separate lines, with voting targets.SEC. 33. Section 26064 of the Streets and Highways Code is amended to read:26064. The ballot shall contain the words “Shall the boulevard district be formed?” To the right of or below these words, the words “Yes” and “No” shall be printed on separate lines, with voting targets. The ballot shall also make provision for voting for one member of the commission.SEC. 34. Section 26163 of the Streets and Highways Code is amended to read:26163. At any time prior to the day fixed for the election the commission shall select one or more polling places within the district, and appoint from among the qualified electors within the district, one inspector, and two judges for each polling place who shall constitute the officers of the election and the election board, and shall make all other necessary and proper arrangements for holding the election. To the right of or below each bond proposition on the ballot, the words “Yes” and “No” shall be printed on separate lines, with voting targets.SEC. 35. Section 12057 of the Water Code is amended to read:12057. (a) Before a public agency may enter into a contract with the department for a water supply from the Washoe Project, or from any division or unit thereof, the public agency shall hold an election on the proposition of whether or not the public agency shall enter into the proposed contract and more than 50 percent of the votes cast at the election must be in favor of the proposition. If a higher percentage of favorable votes is required by the California Constitution before the public agency may incur indebtedness, the higher percentage shall apply in lieu of the percentage set forth in this subdivision. The election shall be held in accordance with the following provisions:(1) The procedure for holding an election on the incurring of bonded indebtedness by a public agency shall be utilized for an election on the proposed contract as nearly as the same may be applicable. Where the law applicable to the public agency does not contain a bond election procedure, the procedure set forth in the Revenue Bond Law of 1941 (Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 54300) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code), as it may now or hereafter be amended, shall be utilized as nearly as the same may be applicable.(2) No particular form of ballot is required.(3) The notice of the election shall include a statement of the time and place of the election, the purpose of the election, the general purpose of the contract, and the maximum amount of money to be borrowed from the state under the contract.(4) The ballots for the election shall contain a brief statement of the general purpose of the contract substantially as stated in the notice of the election. To the right of or below the statement of the proposition to be voted on, the words “Yes” and “No” shall be printed on separate lines, with voting targets.(5) The election shall be held in the entire public agency except where the public agency proposes to contract with the department on behalf of a specified portion, or of specified portions, of the public agency, in which case the election shall be held in the applicable portion or portions of the public agency only.(b) Every public agency is hereby granted the power to bring an action in the superior court of the county in which the office of the public agency is situated to determine the validity of any contract made with the department under this part, and the authority of the public agency to enter into the contract. The action shall be had as in the case of the judicial determination of the validity of the public agency’s bonds, as nearly as the same may be applicable, and with like effect. Where the law applicable to the public agency does not set forth a procedure for the judicial determination of the validity of the public agency’s bonds, the action shall be had as in the case of the judicial determination of the general obligation bonds of irrigation districts under the Irrigation District Law (Division 11 (commencing with Section 20500)), as it may now or hereafter be amended, as nearly as the same may be applicable, and with like effect.SEC. 36. Section 12889.2 of the Water Code is amended to read:12889.2. The election shall be held in accordance with the following provisions:(a) The procedure for holding an election on the incurring of bonded indebtedness by the public agency shall be utilized for an election on the proposed contract as nearly as the same may be applicable. Where the law applicable to the public agency does not contain a bond election procedure, the procedure set forth in the Revenue Bond Law of 1941 (Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 54300) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code), as it may now or hereafter be amended, shall be utilized as nearly as the same may be applicable.(b) No particular form of ballot is required.(c) The notice of the election shall include a statement of the time and place of the election, the purpose of the election, the general purpose of the contract, and the maximum amount of money to be borrowed from the state under the contract.(d) The ballots for the election shall contain a brief statement of the general purpose of the contract substantially as stated in the notice of the election and shall state the maximum amount of money to be borrowed from the state under the contract. To the right of or below the statement of the proposition to be voted on, the words “Yes” and “No” shall be printed on separate lines, with voting targets.(e) The election shall be held in the entire public agency except where the public agency proposes to contract with the department on behalf of a specified portion, or of specified portions, of the public agency, in which case the election shall be held in the applicable portion or portions of the public agency only.SEC. 37. Section 13417 of the Water Code is amended to read:13417. The election shall be held in accordance with the following provisions:(a) The procedure for holding an election on the incurring of bonded indebtedness by the public agency shall be utilized for an election of the proposed contract as nearly as the same may be applicable. Where the law applicable to the public agency does not contain a bond election procedure, the procedure set forth in the Revenue Bond Law of 1941 (Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 54300) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code), as it may now or hereafter be amended, shall be utilized as nearly as the same may be applicable.(b) No particular form of ballot is required.(c) The notice of the election shall include a statement of the time and place of the election, the purpose of the election, the general purpose of the contract, and the maximum amount of money to be borrowed from the state under the contract.(d) The ballots for the election shall contain a brief statement of the general purpose of the contract substantially as stated in the notice of the election and shall state the maximum amount of money to be borrowed from the state under the contract. To the right of or below the statement of the proposition to be voted on, the words “Yes” and “No” shall be printed on separate lines, with voting targets.(e) The election shall be held in the entire public agency except where the public agency proposes to contract with the state board on behalf of a specified portion, or of specified portions of the public agency, in which case the election shall be held in the applicable portion or portions of the public agency only.SEC. 38. Section 21929 of the Water Code is amended to read:21929. The ballots shall contain a general statement of the proposals to be voted on, including the amount of bonds proposed to be issued for each purpose, but an informality in the statement shall not vitiate the election. To the right of or below each proposal, the words “Yes” and “No” shall be printed on separate lines, with voting targets.SEC. 39. Section 21930 of the Water Code is repealed.SEC. 40. Section 21930 is added to the Water Code, to read:21930. Bond election ballots shall include instructions to voters that are consistent with the requirements of Section 13204 of the Elections Code.SEC. 41. Section 21931 of the Water Code is amended to read:21931. The voters shall vote for or against any proposal at a bond election by completely selecting the voting target next to either “Yes” or “No,” respectively.SEC. 42. Section 22171 of the Water Code is amended to read:22171. The board may in its discretion by resolution call an election to be held in the entire district or only in that portion of the district proposed to be served to determine whether the district should provide for sewage disposal service. The ballots shall contain the following statement of the proposal:“Shall the ____ Irrigation District provide for sewage disposal, or acquire existing sewage disposal facilities, within that portion of its boundaries as hereinafter described not now provided with adequate sewage collection and disposal works.”Notwithstanding the foregoing, the ballots of any district which is required to obtain the approval of the local agency formation commission before it may provide sewage disposal shall contain the following statement of the proposal:“Shall the ____ Irrigation District provide for sewage disposal, or acquire existing sewage disposal facilities, within that portion of the district, and in the manner, set forth in the proposed application to the ____ Local Agency Formation Commission, dated ____, a copy of which application is on file in the office of the district.”To the right of or below the proposal, the words “Yes” and “No” shall be printed on separate lines, with voting targets.SEC. 43. Section 22172 of the Water Code is repealed.SEC. 44. Section 22172 is added to the Water Code, to read:22172. The ballots shall include instructions to voters that are consistent with the requirements of Section 13204 of the Elections Code.SEC. 45. Section 22173 of the Water Code is amended to read:22173. The voters shall vote for or against the proposal by completely selecting the voting target next to either “Yes” or “No,” respectively.SEC. 46. Section 23224 of the Water Code is amended to read:23224. The ballots at the election shall contain a brief statement of the general purpose of the contract substantially as stated in the notice of election and the extent of the obligation to be assumed. To the right of or below the statement on the ballot, the words “Yes” and “No” shall be printed on separate lines, with voting targets.SEC. 47. Section 25675 of the Water Code is repealed.SEC. 48. Section 25675 is added to the Water Code, to read:25675. To the right of or below each question on the ballot, the words “Yes” and “No” shall be printed on separate lines, with voting targets.SEC. 49. Section 25703 of the Water Code is repealed.SEC. 50. Section 25703 is added to the Water Code, to read:25703. To the right of or below each question on the ballot, the words “Yes” and “No” shall be printed on separate lines, with voting targets.SEC. 51. Section 35520.15 of the Water Code is amended to read:35520.15. When the secretary files the certificate as provided in Section 35520.11 or, if objections are raised, when the board approves the assessment as finally fixed as provided in Section 35520.14, the board shall call a special district election at which there shall be submitted to the electors of the district the question of whether the board shall be authorized to issue bonds secured by the benefit assessment roll. The election shall be held and conducted in the manner set forth in Section 35520.16. To the right of or below each bond proposition on the ballot, the words “Yes” and “No” shall be printed on separate lines, with voting targets.SEC. 52. Section 35520.19 of the Water Code is amended to read:35520.19. If two-thirds or more of the votes are cast in favor of the bonds, the board shall transmit a certified copy of the roll to the district tax collector. The charges assessed by the roll as certified as provided for by Section 35520.11, or as finally fixed as provided for by Section 35520.14, shall, upon recordation of a notice in each affected county in the manner specified in Section 3114 of the Streets and Highways Code, constitute a lien upon the land in each county which is prior to all other liens except city, county, and special district assessments or ad valorem taxes levied or assessed by or under statutory authority. The notice recorded pursuant to this section shall expressly provide that the lien is prior to all other liens except city, county, and special district assessments or ad valorem taxes.SEC. 53. Section 35884 of the Water Code is amended to read:35884. The ballots at the election shall contain a brief statement of the general purpose of the contract substantially as stated in the notice of election and the amount of money to be paid to the United States under the contract. To the right of or below the statement on the ballot, the words “Yes” and “No” shall be printed on separate lines, with voting targets.SEC. 54. Section 39931 of the Water Code is amended to read:39931. On the ballots provided for the formation election shall be printed:(a) To the right of or below the question on the ballot, the words “Yes” and “No” on separate lines, with voting targets.(b) The names of persons to be voted for at the election.SEC. 55. Section 42327 of the Water Code is repealed.SEC. 56. Section 45271 of the Water Code is repealed.SEC. 57. Section 45271 is added to the Water Code, to read:45271. To the right of or below the question on the ballot, the words “Yes” and “No” shall be printed on separate lines, with voting targets.SEC. 58. Section 45276 of the Water Code is amended to read:45276. The county elections officials of the respective counties shall immediately upon receipt of the ballots, papers, and documents from the board of election certify to the board of directors at its office a statement of the result of the election held in each of the counties with a statement of the number of votes for the proposition and opposed to the proposition.SEC. 59. Section 48255 of the Water Code is repealed.SEC. 60. Section 48255 is added to the Water Code, to read:48255. To the right of or below the question on the ballot, the words “Yes” and “No” shall be printed on separate lines, with voting targets.SEC. 61. Section 50976 of the Water Code is amended to read:50976. The ballots at the election shall contain a brief statement of the general purpose of the contract substantially as stated in the notice of election and the amount of money to be paid to the United States under the contract. To the right of or below the statement, the words “yes” and “no” shall be printed on separate lines, with voting targets.SEC. 62. Section 60385 of the Water Code is amended to read:60385. The measure so submitted at such election shall be stated on the ballot substantially as follows: “Shall ____ (giving the name or other designation of the territory proposed to be annexed, as stated in the notice of election) be annexed to ____ (name of water replenishment district) subject to the terms and conditions fixed by the board of directors of said district?” To the right of or below the proposition, the words “yes” and “no” shall be printed on separate lines, with voting targets.SEC. 63. Section 60414 of the Water Code is amended to read:60414. Notice of the election shall be published in the district pursuant to Section 6063 of the Government Code. Publication shall be complete at least 7, but not more than 28, days prior to the date fixed for the election. The notice shall describe the boundaries of the area so proposed to be excluded and shall designate the area by some appropriate name, or other words of identification, by which the area may be referred to and indicated upon the ballot to be used at any election at which the question of the exclusion is submitted, as in this act provided. The measure so submitted at the election shall be stated on the ballot substantially as follows:“Shall ____ (giving the name or other designation of the area proposed to be excluded, as stated in the notice of election) be excluded from ____ (name of water replenishment district)?” To the right of or below the proposition, the words “yes” and “no” shall be printed on separate lines, with voting targets.SEC. 64. Section 74099 of the Water Code is amended to read:74099. The board of supervisors shall require the clerk of the board to provide and furnish ballots for the formation election. No particular form of ballot shall be required. To the right of or below the question on the ballot, the words “Yes” and “No” shall be printed on separate lines, with voting targets. The ballot shall also contain the names of candidates for the position of director of the district who shall have been endorsed by petitions to the board of supervisors in the manner prescribed in Section 74100.SEC. 65. Section 74101 of the Water Code is amended to read:74101. The ballots shall contain instructions that the voters shall completely select the voting target next to the words that indicate the voter’s choice.SEC. 66. Section 74467 of the Water Code is amended to read:74467. The election on the proposed redivision of the district shall be held in the same manner as elections for the formation of a district so far as applicable. No particular form of ballot shall be required except that the ballot shall contain the words “Shall ____ Water Conservation District representation be based on (population) (area) rather than on (area) (population) (and shall the number of ____ Water Conservation District directors be (increased) (decreased) from ____ to ____)?” To the right of or below those words, the words “yes” and “no” shall be printed on separate lines, with voting targets. Any proposed redivision or change in number of directors shall become effective if a majority of the electors voting in the election vote “yes” on the question.SEC. 67. Section 74833 of the Water Code is amended to read:74833. The ballots at the bond election shall contain a general statement of the amount and purpose of the bonds to be issued. To the right of or below the statement of the proposition to be voted on, the words “Yes” and “No” shall be printed on separate lines, with voting targets.SEC. 68. Section 74850 of the Water Code is amended to read:74850. If two-thirds of the votes cast upon the proposition at the bond election favor the proposition submitted, the proposition shall be deemed to have been accepted by the voters and to authorize the incurring of a bonded debt and the issuance of bonds in the amount of and for the purpose stated in the proposition.SEC. 69. Section 75063 of the Water Code is amended to read:75063. The ballots at the bond election shall contain a general statement of the amount and purpose of the bonds to be issued. To the right of or below the statement of the proposition to be voted on, the words “Yes” and “No” shall be printed on separate lines, with voting targets.SEC. 70. Section 75065 of the Water Code is amended to read:75065. If two-thirds of the votes cast upon the proposition favor the proposition submitted, the proposition shall be deemed to have been accepted by the voters and to authorize the incurring of a bonded indebtedness and the issuance of bonds in the amount and for the purpose stated in the proposition.SEC. 71. Section 75168.3 of the Water Code is repealed.SEC. 72. Section 75168.3 is added to the Water Code, to read:75168.3. To the right of or below the question on the ballot, the words “Yes” and “No” shall be printed on separate lines, with voting targets.SEC. 73. Section 75393 of the Water Code is repealed.SEC. 74. Section 75393 is added to the Water Code, to read:75393. To the right of or below the question on the ballot, the words “Yes” and “No” shall be printed on separate lines, with voting targets.SEC. 75. Section 75444 of the Water Code is amended to read:75444. The ballots at the election shall contain a general statement of the amount and purpose of the assessment to be levied. To the right of or below the statement of the proposition to be voted on, the words “Yes” and “No” shall be printed on separate lines, with voting targets.SEC. 76. Section 75936 of the Water Code is amended to read:75936. The measure so submitted at such election shall be stated on the ballot substantially as follows: “Shall ____ (giving the name or other designation of the territory proposed to be annexed, as stated in the notice of election) be annexed to ____ (name of water conservation district) subject to the terms and conditions fixed by the board of directors of said district?” To the right of or below the proposition, the words “yes” and “no” shall be printed on separate lines, with voting targets.SEC. 77. Section 76042 of the Water Code is amended to read:76042. The election shall be noticed and conducted, and the returns of the election made and canvassed, in the same manner as is provided for the formation election. To the right of or below the question on the ballot, the words “Yes” and “No” shall be printed on separate lines, with voting targets.